Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ENERGY EFFICIENCY PROJECTS; BRAINERD PUBLIC UTILITIES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $7,500,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of commerce for one or more grants to Brainerd Public Utilities for energy efficiency projects in the city of Brainerd. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, an "energy efficiency project" is a capital improvement that may include one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (1) an upgrade to an existing turbine generator; new text end new text begin (2) acquisition and installation of a new turbine generator to replace an existing turbine generator; or new text end new text begin (3) improvements to existing structures to accommodate new turbine generators. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $7,500,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end